Tennessee, session 114, HB1126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-106(b), is amended by adding
the following sentence to the end of the subsection:
A report submitted under this subsection (b) may be submitted electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1126
002997
- 1 -